Washington statutes.
RCW 19.72.150

Heirs, etc., bound—Exception.

The provisions of RCW 19.72.070 through 19.72.101, 19.72.140, 19.72.141 shall extend to heirs, executors, and administrators of deceased persons, but the provisions of RCW 19.72.101 shall not operate against persons under legal disabilities.

[Code 1881 s 651; RRS s 981. Prior: 1877 p 135 s 654; 1869 p 151 s 591; 1854 p 211 s 433.]